Maine, session 132, LD1005.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §1377, as amended by PL 1997, c. 728, §36, is further amended
by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
The fire department of a municipality registered by the commissioner under Title 25,
section 2448-A may conduct a plan review under this section if the municipal employee
conducting the plan review meets the requirements of Title 25, section 2448-A, subsection
2, paragraph B and the municipal fire department establishes a process for the review of a
plan that includes the requirements of this section and a requirement of thorough evaluation
of a plan to ensure compliance with all applicable codes and standards. If the municipality
has reviewed and approved a plan that meets all the requirements of this section, the
municipality may issue a permit to the fire sprinkler system contractor.